Maryland, session 2026, HB0637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 18–328 through 18–332 and the part “Part V. Pertussis” of Article – Health
– General of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
18–112.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
IMMUNIZATIONS, SCREENINGS, AND PREVENTIVE SERVICES FOR INFANTS,
CHILDREN, AND ADULTS THAT FOLLOW THE GENERALLY ACCEPTED CONSENSUS
WITHIN THE SCIENTIFIC COMMUNITY AND SOUND CLINICAL GUIDANCE AS
SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THE RECOMMENDATIONS SHALL:
(1) BE MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE APPLICABLE
RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE FOLLOWING AUTHORITATIVE MEDICAL
ORGANIZATIONS:
(I) THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS;
(II) THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF OBSTETRICIANS AND
GYNECOLOGISTS; OR
(III) THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF FAMILY PHYSICIANS; AND
(2) TAKE INTO CONSIDERATION THE APPLICABLE GUIDANCE OF:
(I) THE MARYLAND STATEWIDE ADVISORY COMMISSION ON
IMMUNIZATIONS;
(II) THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES, INCLUDING THE HEALTH RESOURCES AND SERVICES ADMINISTRATION;
(III) THE U.S. CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND
PREVENTION, INCLUDING THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION
PRACTICES;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 7
(IV) THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, INCLUDING
THE VACCINES AND RELATED BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS ADVISORY COMMITTEE;
AND
(V) THE U.S. PREVENTIVE SERVICES TASK FORCE.
(C) BEFORE ADOPTING A RECOMMENDATION FOR A PREVENTIVE SERVICE
THAT IS NOT AN IMMUNIZATION AND HAS NOT RECEIVED A RECOMMENDATION FROM
THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES OR AN A OR B RATING
FROM THE U.S. PREVENTIVE SERVICES TASK FORCE, THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) HOLD A NOTICE AND COMMENT PERIOD OF AT LEAST 30 DAYS;
(2) OBTAIN AN ANALYSIS FROM THE MARYLAND HEALTH CARE
COMMISSION ON THE SERVICE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 15–1501 OF
THE INSURANCE ARTICLE; AND
(3) CITE THE APPLICABLE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
AUTHORITATIVE MEDICAL ORGANIZATIONS ON WHICH A RECOMMENDATION WOULD
BE BASED.
(C) (D) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) PUBLISH RECOMMENDATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION ON
THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE; AND
(2) DISTRIBUTE THE RECOMMENDATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION TO LICENSED HEALTH PROFESSIONALS IN THE STATE AND TO THE
MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION.
Article – Health Occupations
12–508.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist may order and
administer a vaccination to an individual who is at least 3 years old if:
(i) The vaccine is:
1. An influenza vaccine;
2. A COVID–19 vaccine; or
3. Used in response to a public health emergency;
– 3 –

Ch. 7 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) The pharmacist has completed a practical training program of at
least 20 hours that is approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and
includes:
1. Hands–on injection techniques;
2. Clinical evaluation of indications and contraindications of
vaccines; and
3. The recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to
vaccines;
(iii) The pharmacist has a current certificate in basic
cardiopulmonary resuscitation;
(iv) The pharmacist has completed a minimum of 2 hours of
continuing pharmaceutical education related to immunizations that is approved by the
Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education as part of the license renewal requirements
under § 12–309 of this title;
(v) The pharmacist complies with the record–keeping and reporting
requirements in paragraph (5) of this subsection and any corresponding regulations
adopted by the Board; and
(vi) If the vaccination is administered to an individual under the age
of 18 years, the pharmacist informs the child vaccination patient and adult caregiver who
is accompanying the child of the importance of well–child visits with a pediatric primary
care provider and refers the patient to a pediatric primary care provider when appropriate.
(2) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist who has met
the requirement of paragraph (1)(ii) through (vi) of this subsection may administer to an
individual who is at least 7 years old a vaccination that is:
(i) Recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices; [or]
(ii) Approved or authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration; OR
(III) RECOMMENDED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 18–112 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, a pharmacist who has met
the requirement of paragraph (1)(ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection may administer to an
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 7
adult a vaccination that is recommended in the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Health Information for International Travel.
(4) [(i)] A pharmacist shall administer a vaccination under paragraph
(1), (2), or (3) of this subsection under a written protocol that:
[1.] (I) Is vaccine specific; and
[2.] (II) Meets criteria established by the Department, in
consultation with the Board, the Board of Physicians, and the Board of Nursing, in
regulation.
[(ii) The recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices cited in this section refer to
federal statutes, rules, and guidance in effect:
1. On December 31, 2024; or
2. At a later date to account for any new vaccines
recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on
Immunization Practices after December 31, 2024.]
(5) A pharmacist shall:
(i) Report all vaccinations administered by the pharmacist to the
ImmuNet Program established under § 18–109 of the Health – General Article;
(ii) If the vaccination has been administered in accordance with a
prescription, document at least one effort to inform the individual’s authorized prescriber
that the vaccination has been administered; and
(iii) Except for an influenza vaccination administered under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, if the authorized prescriber is not the individual’s primary
care provider or if the vaccination has not been administered in accordance with a
prescription, document at least one effort to inform the individual’s primary care provider
or other usual source of care that the vaccination has been administered.
(b) The Board shall:
(1) Set reasonable fees for the administration of vaccinations under this
section; and
(2) Adopt regulations that require a pharmacist to submit a registration
form to the Board that includes verification that the pharmacist:
– 5 –

Ch. 7 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Has successfully completed a certification course approved by the
Board [that included instruction in the guidelines and recommendations of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention regarding vaccinations in effect on December 31, 2024];
and
(ii) Is certified in basic cardiopulmonary resuscitation and obtained
the certification through in–person classroom instruction.
Article – Insurance
15–1A–10.
(a) Subject to subsection (e) of this section and except as provided in subsections
(b), (c), and (d) of this section, a carrier shall provide coverage for and may not impose any
cost–sharing requirements, including copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles for:
(1) evidence–based items or services that have in effect a rating of A or B
in the recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force with respect
to the individual involved;
(2) immunizations for routine use in children, adolescents, and adults that
have in effect a recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices
of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention with respect to the individual involved,
if the recommendation:
(i) has been adopted by the Director of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention; or
(ii) is listed on the Immunization Schedules of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention for routine use;
(3) with respect to infants, children, and adolescents, evidence–informed
preventive care and screenings provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the
Health Resources and Services Administration; and
(4) with respect to women:
(i) to the extent not provided in item (ii) of this item, preventive care
and screenings as provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health
Resources and Services Administration for purposes of § 2713(a)(4) of the federal Public
Health Service Act; and
(ii) subject to § 15–826(c) of this title, contraceptive coverage as
provided for in comprehensive guidelines supported by the Health Resources and Services
Administration for purposes of § 2713(a)(4) of the federal Public Health Service Act.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 7
(b) To the extent that cost–sharing is otherwise allowed under federal or State
law, a health benefit plan that uses a network of providers may impose cost–sharing
requirements on the coverage described in subsection (a) of this section for items or services
delivered by an out–of–network provider.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “high deductible health plan” has the meaning stated
in 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2).
(2) If an insured or enrollee is covered under a high deductible health plan,
a carrier may apply the deductible requirement of the high deductible health plan to the
coverage required under subsection (a) of this section, unless the Commissioner determines
that the coverage is included in the safe harbor provisions for preventive care under 26
U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(c).
(d) This section may not be construed to prohibit a carrier from providing
coverage for services in addition to those recommended by the United States Preventive
Services Task Force or to deny coverage for services that are not recommended by the Task
Force.
(e) Subject to § 15–826(c) of this title[:
(1)], the Commissioner shall enforce this section consistent with the
recommendations and guidelines in effect on December 31, 2024, set by the United States
Preventive Services Task Force, the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or the Health Resources and Services
Administration, and related federal rules or guidance[; and
(2) the Commissioner may adopt regulations:
(i) necessary to carry out this section, consistent with federal
statutes, rules, and guidance in effect:
1. on December 31, 2024; or
2. at a later date that enhance the scope of preventive
services to the benefit of consumers in the State; or
(ii) to require carriers to provide coverage without imposing
cost–sharing requirements, including copayments, coinsurance, or deductibles, for any
future preventive services recommendations and guidelines issued after December 31,
2024, by the United States Preventive Services Task Force, the Advisory Committee on
Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or the Health
Resources and Services Administration, and related federal rules or guidance], AS
UPDATED BY RECOMMENDATIONS ISSUED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 18–112 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
– 7 –

Ch. 7 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) A CARRIER SHALL PROVIDE THE COVERAGE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION FOR PLAN YEARS THAT BEGIN ON OR AFTER THE DATE THAT IS
3 MONTHS 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE THE RECOMMENDATIONS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION ARE ISSUED.
15–817.
(a) In this section, “child wellness services” means preventive activities designed
to protect children from morbidity and mortality and promote child development.
(b) This section applies to each individual hospital or major medical insurance
policy, group or blanket health insurance policy, and nonprofit health service plan that:
(1) is delivered or issued for delivery in the State;
(2) is written on an expense–incurred basis; and
(3) provides coverage for a family member of the insured.
(c) (1) A policy or plan subject to this section shall include under the family
member coverage a minimum package of child wellness services that are consistent with:
(i) public health policy;
(ii) professional standards; and
(iii) scientific evidence of effectiveness.
(2) The minimum package of child wellness services shall cover at least:
(i) all visits for and costs of childhood and adolescent immunizations
recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention as of December 31, 2024, AS UPDATED BY
RECOMMENDATIONS ISSUED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 18–112 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(ii) visits for the collection of adequate samples, the first of which is
to be collected before 2 weeks of age, for hereditary and metabolic newborn screening and
follow–up between birth and 4 weeks of age;
(iii) universal hearing screening of newborns provided by a hospital
before discharge;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 7
(iv) all visits for and costs of age–appropriate screening tests for
tuberculosis, anemia, lead toxicity, hearing, and vision as determined by the American
Academy of Pediatrics;
(v) all visits for obesity evaluation and management;
(vi) all visits for and costs of developmental screening as
recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics;
(vii) a physical examination, developmental assessment, and
parental anticipatory guidance services at each of the visits required under items (i), (ii),
(iv), (v), and (vi) of this paragraph; and
(viii) any laboratory tests considered necessary by the physician as
indicated by the services provided under items (i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii) of this paragraph.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, an insurer or nonprofit
health service plan that issues a policy or plan subject to this section, on notification of the
pregnancy of the insured and before the delivery date, shall:
(1) encourage and help the insured to choose and contact a primary care
provider for the expected newborn before delivery; and
(2) provide the insured with information on postpartum home visits for the
mother and the expected newborn, including the names of health care providers that are
available for postpartum home visits.
(e) An insurer or nonprofit health service plan that does not require or encourage
the insured to use a particular health care provider or group of health care providers that
has contracted with the insurer or nonprofit health service plan to provide services to the
insurer’s or nonprofit health service plan’s insureds need not comply with subsection (d) of
this section.
(f) (1) A policy or plan subject to this section may not impose a deductible on
the coverage required under this section.
(2) Each health insurance policy and certificate shall contain a notice of the
prohibition established by paragraph (1) of this subsection in a form approved by the
Commissioner.
(g) The Commissioner may adopt regulations necessary to carry out subsection
(c)(2)(i) of this section consistent with federal statutes, rules, and guidance in effect[:
(1)] on December 31, 2024[; or
– 9 –

Ch. 7 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) at a later date to account for any new vaccines recommended by the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization
Practices after December 31, 2024], AS UPDATED BY RECOMMENDATIONS ISSUED BY
THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 18–112 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 10 –